Massachusetts, session 194th, H4168.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Acton may increase the 15-mile
residency limit contained in said section 99A of said chapter 41 for members of the Acton police
and fire departments. Provided, that any increase in the residency limit shall be subject to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated in accordance with chapter 150E of the General
Laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1